Hawaii, session 2026, HB2051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-364, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Any candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee that receives in the aggregate more than the applicable contribution limit in section 11-351, 11-357, 11-358, 11-359, or 11-360 shall return any excess contribution to the contributor within thirty days of receipt of the excess contribution.  Any candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee that receives in the aggregate more than the applicable contribution limit in section 11-362 shall return any excess contribution to the contributor within thirty days of the end of the election period; provided that the candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee may choose which contributions to return.  Any excess contribution not returned to the contributor within thirty days shall escheat to the Hawaii election campaign fund." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request